Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 5
NOTICE AND PREPARATION FOR ELECTIONS

31-10-501. Clerk to give notice.

The clerk, at least ten days before each municipal election, shall give written or printed notice of the election stating the date of the election and the hours during which the polls will be open, designating the polling place of each precinct, stating the qualifications of persons to vote in the election, naming the officers to be elected and the questions to be voted upon, and listing the names of those candidates whose nominations have been certified to him, which listing shall be as nearly as possible in the form in which such nominations shall appear upon the official ballot with reference to wards where applicable. A copy of such notice shall be posted until after the election in a conspicuous place in the office of the clerk.

In addition, the notice shall be published in at least one newspaper having general circulation in the municipality. If the clerk finds it impracticable to make the publication on the tenth day before the election day, he shall make the same on the earliest possible day before the tenth day. The publications in any weekly newspaper shall be in the next to last issue thereof before the day of election.

All polling places shall be designated by a sign conspicuously posted at least ten days before each municipal election. Such sign shall be substantially in the following form: "POLLING PLACE FOR PRECINCT NO. ...". In addition, such sign shall state the date of the next election and the hours the polling place will be open.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1047, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1501, § 14, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-501 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-501.5. Ballot issue notice.

Any ballot issue notice, as defined in section 1-1-104 (2.5), C.R.S., relating to a municipal ballot issue, as defined in section 1-1-104 (2.3), C.R.S., shall be prepared and distributed in a manner consistent with part 9 of article 7 of title 1, C.R.S.

In addition to the requirements set forth in subsection (1) of this section, a municipality submitting a ballot issue concerning the creation of any debt or other financial obligation at an election in the municipality shall post notice in accordance with the requirements of section 1-7-908, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1192, § 93, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 750, § 6, effective August 6.

31-10-502. Establishing precincts and polling places.

The governing body of each municipality shall divide the municipality into as many election precincts for municipal elections as it deems expedient for the convenience of electors of said municipality and shall designate the location and address for each precinct at which elections are to be held. Municipal election precincts shall consist of one or more whole general election precincts wherever practicable, and clerks and governing bodies shall cooperate with the county clerk and recorder and board of county commissioners of their county to accomplish this purpose. In municipalities having wards, no precinct or part thereof shall be located within more than one ward, and each ward shall contain at least one precinct. The precincts shall be numbered consecutively beginning with the number one. The precincts and polling places established pursuant to this section shall remain until changed by the governing body.

Repealed.

Changes in the boundaries of election precincts or wards and the creation of new election precincts shall be completed not less than ninety days prior to any municipal election, except in cases of precinct changes resulting from annexations.

All changes in precinct or ward boundaries and in municipal boundaries shall be reported by the clerk to the county clerk and recorder, and a corrected map shall be transmitted to the county clerk and recorder as soon as possible after such changes have been effected.

It is the duty of the governing body to change any polling place upon petition of a majority of the registered electors residing within the precinct.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1046, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(1)(b) and (1)(c) repealed, p. 1182, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(3) amended, p. 1502, § 15, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-502 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-503. Judges may change polling places.

When it becomes impossible or inconvenient to hold an election at the place designated therefor, the judges of election, after notifying the clerk and after having assembled at or as near as practicable to such place and before receiving any vote, may move to the nearest convenient place for holding the election and at such newly designated place forthwith proceed with the election.

Upon moving to a new polling place, the judges shall display a proclamation of the change and shall station a police officer or some other proper person at the original polling place to notify all registered electors of the new location for holding the election.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1048, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1502, § 16, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-503 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-504. Number of voting booths or voting machines.

In municipalities which use paper ballots, the governing body shall provide in each polling place a sufficient number of voting booths. Each voting booth shall be situated so as to permit voters to prepare their ballots screened from observation and shall be furnished with such supplies and conveniences as will enable the voter to prepare his ballot for voting.

In municipalities which use voting machines, the governing body shall supply each precinct with a sufficient number of voting machines.

In municipalities which use an electronic voting system, the governing body shall provide adequate materials and equipment for the orderly conduct of voting.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1048, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-504 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-505. Arrangement of voting machines or voting booths and ballot boxes.

The voting machines or the voting booths and ballot box shall be situated in the polling place so as to be in plain view of the election officials and watchers. No person other than the election officials and those admitted for the purpose of voting shall be permitted within the immediate voting area, which shall be considered as within six feet of the voting machines or the voting booths and ballot box, except by authority of the judges of election, and then only when necessary to keep order and enforce the law.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1048, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-505 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-506. Election expenses to be paid by municipality.

The cost of conducting a municipal election, including the cost of printing and supplies, shall be paid by the municipality in which such election is held.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1048, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-513 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-507. Election may be canceled - when.

In any ordinance adopted by the governing body of the municipality requiring an affidavit of intent for write-in candidates as provided in section 31-10-306, the governing body may also provide that, if the only matter before the voters is the election of persons to office and if, at the close of business on the sixty-fourth day before the election, there are not more candidates than offices to be filled at such election, including candidates filing affidavits of intent, the clerk, if instructed by resolution of the governing body either before or after such date, shall cancel the election and by resolution declare the candidates elected. If so provided by ordinance, upon such declaration the candidates shall be deemed elected. Notice of such cancellation shall be published, if possible, in order to inform the electors of the municipality, and notice of such cancellation shall be posted at each polling place and in not less than one other public place.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 1502, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 755, § 26, effective April 4.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 591, § 77, effective May 18.